Arkansas, session 2025, HB1974.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative findings.
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Protecting Arkansans and being good stewards of taxpayer
dollars are top priorities for our state;
(2) A strong economy depends on a legal and reliable workforce,
ensuring that state government jobs go to individuals who are here lawfully
and contributing to our communities;
(3) Arkansas is not a sanctuary state, and Arkansas enforces our
laws to protect wages, support local businesses, and ensure that taxpayer
resources are used responsibly; and
(4) By upholding these principles, we are safeguarding
*CRH069*
04-09-2025 10:25:31 CRH069

As Engrossed: H4/9/25 HB1974
opportunities for hardworking Arkansans and securing a prosperous future for
our state.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 21, Chapter 3, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 9 - E-Verify Requirement Act.

21-3-901. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the "E-Verify
Requirement Act".

21-3-902. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Employee” means a person directed, allowed, or permitted to
perform labor or services of any kind for a state employer;
(2) "Employer" means a state government department, board, bureau,
political subdivision, or agency licensed under statute or rule to operate in
this state;
(3) “E-Verify” means the electronic verification system operated
by United States Citizenship and Immigration Services, or its successor
program, as authorized by the Illegal Immigration Reform and Immigrant
Responsibility Act of 1996, Pub. L. No. 104-208; and
(4) “Unauthorized alien” means the same as defined by 8 U.S.C. §
1324a(h)(3), as it existed on January 1, 2025.

21-3-903. Requirement to verify all new employees.
(a)(1) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, an
employer shall register and create an E-Verify employer account.
(2) After hiring an employee, an employer shall:
(A) Employ provisionally the employee until the employee’s
work authorization has been verified through E-Verify;
(B) Submit the employee’s name and information for
verification through E-Verify even if the employee’s employment is terminated
less than three (3) business days after becoming employed; and
(C) Keep a record of the verification for the duration of
the employee’s employment with the employer or for three (3) years, whichever
04-09-2025 10:25:31 CRH069

As Engrossed: H4/9/25 HB1974
is longer.
(3) If the employee’s work authorization is not verified by E-
Verify, an employer shall not employ, continue to employ, or reemploy the
employee.
(b)(1) An employer is not required to comply with subsection (a) of
this section if an employee was hired by the employer prior to the effective
date of this act.
(2) The employer is not required to verify or reverify the
eligibility of a current employee to work pursuant to federal law.

21-3-904. Compliance with federal immigration law.
Nothing in this act shall be construed to abrogate an employer’s
obligation to comply with federal immigration laws, including without
limitation the completion and maintenance of federal employment eligibility
verification forms or documents.

21-3-905. Prohibition on employment of unauthorized aliens.
(a) An employer shall not employ an unauthorized alien.
(b) Failure to comply with the requirements under this subchapter
shall be presumed a violation of this section.

21-3-906. Enforcement.
(a) For the purpose of enforcement of this subchapter, the Department
of Labor and Licensing may request, and an employer shall provide, copies of
any documentation relied upon by the employer for the verification of a new
employee's employment eligibility.
(b) A person or an entity that makes a request under subsection (a) of
this section shall rely upon the United States Government to verify an
employee's employment eligibility and may not independently make a final
determination as to whether an employee is an unauthorized alien.
(c) Beginning on July 1, 2026, if the department determines that an
employer failed to use E-Verify system to verify the employment eligibility
of employees as required under this subchapter, the department shall:
(1) Notify the employer of the department's determination of
noncompliance; and
(2) Provide the employer with thirty (30) days to cure the
04-09-2025 10:25:31 CRH069

As Engrossed: H4/9/25 HB1974
noncompliance.

SECTION 3. DO NOT CODIFY. Effective date.
This act shall be effective on and after January 1, 2026.

/s/Long






























04-09-2025 10:25:31 CRH069